Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 11. Reports, Filings, Interrogatories, Fees, Taxes, Penalties, Enforcement, and Cancellations.

Sec. 10.06.805.
Biennial report of domestic and foreign corporations.

A domestic corporation and a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall file a biennial report within the time prescribed by this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Collateral references. —

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, § 272 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations, §§ 638, 639.

Sec. 10.06.808.
Contents of biennial report.

A biennial report must set out

the name of the corporation and the state or country where it is incorporated;

the address of the registered office of the corporation in this state, and the name of its registered agent in this state at that address, and, in the case of a foreign corporation, the address of its principal office in the state or country where it is incorporated;

a brief statement of the character of the business in which the corporation is engaged in this state and the codes from the identification code established under AS

10.06.870

that most closely describe the activities in which the corporation is engaged in this state;

the names and addresses of the directors and officers of the corporation;

a statement of the aggregate number of shares that the corporation has authority to issue, itemized by classes, par value of shares, shares without par value, and series, if any, within a class;

a statement of the aggregate number of issued shares itemized by classes, par value of shares, shares without par value, and series, if any, within a class;

the name and address of each alien affiliate, the percentage of outstanding shares controlled by each alien affiliate, and a specific description of the nature of the relationship between the corporation and its alien affiliates, or that there is no alien affiliate;

the name and address of each person owning at least five percent of the shares, or five percent of any class of shares as of September 30 of the second year of the biennial reporting period, and the percentage of the shares or class of shares owned by that person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.811.
Filing of biennial report.

A biennial report of a domestic or foreign corporation shall be filed with the department and is due before January 2 of the filing year. A domestic corporation filing articles of incorporation and a foreign corporation receiving a certificate of authority during an even-numbered year must file the biennial report each even-numbered year. A domestic corporation filing articles of incorporation and a foreign corporation receiving a certificate of authority during an odd-numbered year must file the biennial report each odd-numbered year. The biennial report is delinquent if not filed before February 1 of each odd or even year as provided in this section. Delinquent returns are subject to the penalty in AS

10.06.815

.

Proof to the satisfaction of the commissioner that on or before February 1 the report was deposited in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, properly addressed with postage prepaid, is compliance with (a) of this section.

The commissioner shall file the report if it conforms to the requirements of this chapter. If the commissioner finds that the report does not conform to the requirements of this chapter, the report shall promptly be returned to the corporation for necessary corrections. If the report is corrected to conform to the requirements of this chapter and returned to the commissioner in sufficient time to be filed before April 1 of the year in which it is due, the penalties for failure to file the report within the time provided in AS

10.06.815

do not apply.

Upon receipt of a form from the commissioner, a domestic or foreign corporation must file a biennial report within six months after original incorporation or authorization to transact business in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 15 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Sec. 10.06.813.
Filing notice of change of officers, directors, five percent shareholders, and alien affiliates.

In the event of a change of an officer, director, or alien affiliate of a corporation during the first year of the biennial reporting period or a change in a five percent shareholder before September 30 of the first year of the biennial reporting period, the corporation shall file a notice of change amending the biennial report of the corporation before the following January 2.

The notice shall be filed with the commissioner and shall state the name and current mailing address of each director, officer, five percent shareholder, or alien affiliate not included in the corporation’s last filed biennial report, and the name of the person replaced and the office held. The notice shall be signed by the president or vice-president of the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.815.
Penalty for failure to file biennial report.

A domestic or foreign corporation that fails or refuses to file a biennial report within the time set by this chapter is subject to a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the corporation tax assessed against it for the period beginning January 1 of the year for which the report should have been filed. The commissioner shall assess the penalty at the time of the assessment of the corporation tax. If the amount of the corporation tax as originally assessed is adjusted in accordance with this chapter, the amount of the penalty shall also be adjusted to 10 percent of the amount of the adjusted corporation tax. The amount of the corporation tax and the amount of the penalty shall be separately stated in a notice to the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.818.
Interrogatories by commissioner; judicial review.

The commissioner may propound to a domestic or foreign corporation and to an officer or director of a domestic or foreign corporation interrogatories reasonably necessary and proper to enable the commissioner to ascertain whether the corporation has complied with the provisions of this chapter.

Interrogatories shall be propounded by the commissioner or the designee of the commissioner to

a domestic corporation by complying with AS

10.06.175

;

a foreign corporation by complying with AS

10.06.763

;

an individual officer or director of a domestic or foreign corporation by mailing by certified mail a copy of the interrogatories addressed to the person at the place of business of the person in this state, or, if the person has no place of business in this state, to the principal office or place of business of the person.

Interrogatories shall be answered within 30 days or within the additional time fixed by the commissioner or by the superior court. Answers shall be full and complete, in writing and under oath. If the interrogatories are directed to an individual, they shall be answered by that person, and if directed to a corporation they shall be answered by the president, vice-president, secretary, or assistant secretary of the corporation or, in the instance of a foreign corporation, the person or persons functioning as comparable officers in accordance with the laws of the state of incorporation.

A petition stating good cause to extend the date for answer, to modify or set aside the interrogatories propounded by the commissioner, or to enforce compliance with AS

10.06.820

may be filed in the superior court before the expiration of the 30 days fixed in this section for answer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.820.
Confidentiality of information disclosed by interrogatories.

Interrogatories and answers propounded and obtained under AS

10.06.818

are not open to public inspection and the commissioner may not disclose facts or information obtained from the interrogatories except as the official duty of the commissioner requires or unless the interrogatories or the answers are required for evidence in criminal proceedings or other action by the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.823.
Failure or refusal to answer interrogatories; filing of related documents.

Unless otherwise provided by an order of court issued in response to a petition filed under AS

10.06.818(d)

,

a domestic or foreign corporation and each officer or director of a domestic or foreign corporation that fails or refuses to answer truthfully and fully interrogatories propounded by the commissioner within the time prescribed by AS

10.06.818(c)

is guilty of a class A misdemeanor; and

the commissioner need not file a document to which the interrogatories relate until the interrogatories are properly answered and need not file a document to which the interrogatories relate if the answers disclose that the document does not conform to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 10.06.825.
Penalty imposed upon officers and directors.

An officer or director of a domestic or foreign corporation who signs articles, or a statement, report, application, or other document filed with the commissioner that is known to the officer or director to be false in a material respect, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 10.06.828.
Fees for filing articles and certain applications.

A domestic or foreign corporation that is required to file articles of incorporation, an application for a certificate of authority, amendatory articles, or other application with the department, except corporate entities organized under AS 10.20 and corporate entities organized under the laws of the United States or the laws of a state or territory of the United States or the laws of a foreign country for the same purposes as those allowed under AS 10.20, shall pay to the commissioner a filing fee established by the department by regulation. The filing fee shall be uniform and fixed without reference to the amount of authorized shares.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 51 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Collateral references. —

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, § 174.

18 C.J.S., Corporations, § 62.

Sec. 10.06.830.
Fees for filing certain documents related to agents.

A foreign corporation filing with the department a certificate of the appointment and consent of an agent residing in this state, or a certificate of revocation of the appointment of a resident agent, shall pay to the commissioner a fee established by the department by regulation.

For filing a statement of change of address of registered agent under AS

10.06.170(a)

or resignation under AS

10.06.170(b)

, the agent shall pay to the commissioner a fee established by the department by regulation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.833.
Payments and filing for withdrawal of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation that has been issued a certificate of authority under AS

10.06.705

may withdraw from this state upon payment of all biennial corporation taxes and penalties due at the time of desired withdrawal and by filing with the department an application for a certificate of withdrawal signed by its proper officers and under its corporate seal. The fee for filing the application with the commissioner shall be established by the department by regulation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 11 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 16 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.835.
Fees on dissolution of domestic corporation.

A domestic corporation shall pay to the commissioner a fee established by the department by regulation for filing the documents required by this chapter for the dissolution of a domestic corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.838.
Payments and filing required for certificate of dissolution of foreign corporation.

If a foreign corporation desires to file a certificate of dissolution from the state of its incorporation, it shall file the certificate, signed by the proper state officer, under seal, upon payment of all biennial corporation taxes and penalties due to this state at the time of dissolution. The filing fee for the certificate of dissolution shall be established by the department by regulation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.840.
Fees for certified copies of documents.

The fee for furnishing a certified copy of a document shall be established by the department by regulation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.843.
Other filing fees.

The filing fee for a document not otherwise provided in this chapter shall be established by the department by regulation.

The department may by regulation charge a corporation subject to this chapter a fixed fee in place of the fees specified in this chapter, and for routine administrative services rendered to a corporation by the department.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section fees required under AS

10.06.140

and AS

10.06.828

are not included in a fixed fee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.845.
Biennial corporation tax; penalty for nonpayment.

A domestic corporation and a foreign corporation doing business in this state or having its articles of incorporation on file with the department shall, before January 2 of each filing year, pay to the commissioner a biennial corporation tax as follows: domestic corporation, $100; foreign corporation, $200. A corporation that fails to pay the biennial corporation tax before February 1 of the filing year must pay to the commissioner a penalty of $25 for each year or part of a year of delinquency.

Proof to the satisfaction of the commissioner that on or before February 1 the tax or report was deposited in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, properly addressed, with postage prepaid, is compliance with (a) of this section.

Corporate entities organized under AS 10.20 are not required to pay the biennial corporation tax imposed by this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.848.
Failure to pay tax or make report as precluding suit by corporation.

A domestic or foreign corporation may not commence a suit, action, or proceeding in a court in this state without alleging and proving at the time it commences the suit, action, or proceeding that it has paid its biennial corporation tax last due and has filed its biennial report for the last reporting period. A certificate of the payment of the biennial corporation tax and filing of the biennial report is prima facie evidence of the payment of the tax and the filing of the biennial report. The commissioner shall issue the certificate or a duplicate for a fee established by the department by regulation.

A corporation that is dissolved involuntarily may commence an action under AS

10.06.675

without complying with (a) of this section.

A foreign or domestic corporation that satisfies (a) of this section but is dissolved after commencing the suit, action, or proceeding may continue to maintain the action after the dissolution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.850.
Suits to compel tax payment; exemption from corporation tax.

The commissioner may institute a suit in the name of the state to enforce the payment of a biennial corporation tax. Corporate entities organized under AS 10.20 and foreign corporations organized under the laws of the United States or the laws of a state or territory of the United States or the laws of a foreign country for the same purposes as those allowed under AS 10.20 are exempt from the payment of the biennial corporation tax.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.853.
Failure to pay tax as evidence of inability to meet maturing debts and liabilities.

Failure of a corporation to pay the biennial corporation tax for a period of one year after the date when payment first becomes due is prima facie evidence of the inability of a corporation to meet maturing debts and liabilities that may be shown under AS

10.06.360

by the state, a private person, or a corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.855.
Payments to be made in advance.

Fees and charges provided for in this chapter, including the biennial corporation tax, shall be paid in advance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 52 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Sec. 10.06.858.
Accounting for and deposit of taxes and fees paid.

All fees and taxes paid under this chapter shall be accounted for and deposited in the general fund.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991)

Sec. 10.06.863.
Appeal from revocation of certificate of authority.

If the commissioner revokes a certificate of authority of a foreign corporation to transact business in this state under this chapter, the foreign corporation may appeal to the superior court by filing with the clerk of the court a notice of appeal setting out a copy of its certificate of authority and a copy of the notice of revocation given by the commissioner. The matter shall be tried de novo by the superior court, and the court shall either sustain the action of the commissioner or direct the commissioner to take action the court considers proper.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of this section on Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure 204 and 609, see secs. 31 and 32, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.06.865.
Cancellation of certificates issued and filings accepted.

The commissioner may, within one year after a filing, and after written notice to the corporation or individual making the filing, cancel a certificate issued or filing accepted under this chapter, on any ground existing at the time of issuance or filing for which the commissioner could have originally refused to issue the certificate or accept the filing. The notice of cancellation must state the reason for the cancellation. A corporation or individual may request a hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) within 90 days after receipt of the notice. Cancellation becomes final if the corporation or individual does not request a hearing within 90 days after receipt of notice. Notice of cancellation shall be sent by certified mail with return receipt requested. If the return receipt is not received by the department within a reasonable time and the department has made diligent inquiry as to the address of the corporation, notice may be made by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the vicinity of the registered office of the corporation or the address of the individual who made the filing, and the cancellation becomes final 60 days after publication of the notice if the person or corporation does not request a hearing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 26 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 10.06.868.
Forms to be furnished by the commissioner.

Reports required by this chapter to be filed with the department or the commissioner must be on forms prescribed and furnished by the commissioner. Forms for other documents to be filed in the office of the department or the commissioner shall be furnished by the commissioner on request, but the use of those forms, unless required in this chapter, is not mandatory.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.870.
Identification codes.

The commissioner shall establish and adopt a coded list of business activities and shall make the list available to the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 12 ch 50 SLA 1989)